Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-205
Elections; laws governing.

The votes for the county officers and for the location of the county seat of said new county cast at the first election, provided for in sections 22-202 and 22-203, shall be canvassed and returns made by the county clerk or county clerks of the county or counties from which the new county was formed, as provided by law in other cases.

Laws 1879, § 13, p. 357;

R.S.1913, § 916;

C.S.1922, § 822;

C.S.1929, § 25-205;

R.S.1943, § 22-205.

For canvass and return of votes, see Chapter 32, article 10.